incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
    <pardef n="απ/ών__adj">
      <e><p><l>ούσα</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ούσας</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ούσα</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ούσες</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ουσών</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ούσες</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ών</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντος</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντα</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντες</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντων</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντες</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όν</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντος</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όν</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντα</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντων</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντα</l><r>ών<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="β/ίαιος__adj">
      <e><p><l>ιαιότερος</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιη</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιης</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιη</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιη</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιες</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιων</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιες</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιες</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιος</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιου</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιο</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιε</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιοι</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιων</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιους</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιοι</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιο</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιου</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιο</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιο</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαια</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαιων</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαια</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίαια</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιαιότατος</l><r>ίαιος<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κοιν/ός__adj">
      <e><p><l>ότερος</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ή</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ής</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ή</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ή</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ές</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ών</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ές</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ές</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ός</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ού</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ό</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έ</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οί</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ών</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ούς</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οί</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ό</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ού</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ό</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ό</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ά</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ών</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ά</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ά</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="απών"><i>απ</i><par n="απ/ών__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="βίαιος"><i>β</i><par n="β/ίαιος__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="κοινός"><i>κοιν</i><par n="κοιν/ός__adj"/></e>
